Massachusetts, session 194th, H4858.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 276 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section
100Q and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
100Q. Unless otherwise provided by law, no person shall make records sealed pursuant to
section 100A, section 100B or section 100C available for inspection in any form by any person.
No person shall make records expunged pursuant to section 100F, section 100G, section 100H or
section 100K available for inspection in any form by any person. Nothing herein shall be
construed to prohibit the maintenance of information relating to an offense after records or files
concerning the offense have been sealed or expunged if the information is kept in a manner that
does not enable identification of the petitioner and is used solely for statistical or bona fide
research purposes.
SECTION 2. Section 100T of said Chapter 276 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 1 to 2, the words “100A or
of 2

section 100B” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- 100A, section 100B or section
100C.
of 2